Utah statutes.
63B-1a-401.   Status of bond records -- Compliance with Registered Public Obligations Act.

(1)  The records of ownership, registration, transfer, and exchange of the bonds, and of persons to whom payment with respect to the obligations are made, are private records as provided in Section 63G-2-302 or protected records as provided in Section 63G-2-305.

(2)  The bonds and any evidences of participation interest in the bonds may be issued, executed, authenticated, registered, transferred, exchanged, and otherwise made to comply with Title 15, Chapter 7, Registered Public Obligations Act.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

